Utah statutes.
23-13-5.   Importation or exportation and release of wildlife unlawful.
It is unlawful for any person to import into or export from the state of Utah
any species of live native or exotic wildlife or to possess or release from
captivity any such imported live wildlife except as provided in this code or
the rules and regulations of the Wildlife Board without first securing written
permission from the division of Wildlife Resources.
